Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 3. AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH AND PROMOTION

CHAPTER 47. TEXAS SHRIMP MARKETING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

Sec. 47.051. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 56(4), eff. September 1, 2021.

(2) "Coastal waters" means all the salt water of the state, including the portion of the Gulf of Mexico that is within the jurisdiction of the state.

(3) "Program" means the Texas shrimp marketing assistance program.

(4) "Shrimp marketing account" means the account in the general revenue fund established under Section 77.002(b), Parks and Wildlife Code.

(5) "Texas-produced shrimp" means wild-caught shrimp commercially harvested from coastal waters by a shrimp boat licensed by the Parks and Wildlife Department.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 265, Sec. 6, eff. June 18, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 677, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 4593), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 2.003, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 56(4), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 47.052. PROGRAM ESTABLISHED. (a) The Texas shrimp marketing assistance program is established in the department to assist the Texas wild-caught shrimping industry in promoting and marketing Texas-produced shrimp and educating the public about the Texas wild-caught shrimping industry and Texas-produced shrimp.

(b) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement the program.

(c) The department may accept grants, gifts, and gratuities from any source, including any governmental entity, any private or public corporation, and any other person, in furtherance of the program. Any funds received as a grant, gift, or gratuity shall be deposited in the shrimp marketing account under Section 77.002, Parks and Wildlife Code.

(d) The program shall be funded at a minimum level of $250,000 per fiscal year with funds deposited into the shrimp marketing account under Section 77.002, Parks and Wildlife Code. The department may not expend more than two percent of the annual program budget on out-of-state travel.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 265, Sec. 6, eff. June 18, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 677, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 4593), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 47.054. PROGRAM STAFF. (a) The commissioner shall employ one or more persons as employees of the department to staff the program.

(b) Unless otherwise expressly provided by the legislature, the source of funding for the payment of employee salaries shall be funds generated from the program, including the 10 percent license fee increase authorized by Section 77.002, Parks and Wildlife Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 265, Sec. 6, eff. June 18, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 677, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 4593), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 47.055. PROMOTION, MARKETING, AND EDUCATION. The program shall promote and advertise the Texas wild-caught shrimping industry by:

(1) developing and maintaining a database of Texas shrimp wholesalers that sell Texas-produced shrimp;

(2) operating a toll-free telephone number to:

(A) receive inquiries from persons who wish to purchase a particular type of Texas-produced shrimp; and

(B) make information about the Texas wild-caught shrimping industry available to the public;

(3) developing a wild-caught shrimping industry marketing plan to increase the consumption of Texas-produced shrimp;

(4) educating the public about Texas-produced shrimp by providing publicity about the information in the program's database to the public and making the information available to the public through the department's toll-free telephone number and electronically through the Internet;

(5) promoting the Texas wild-caught shrimping industry; and

(6) promoting and marketing, and educating consumers about, Texas-produced shrimp using any other method the commissioner determines appropriate.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 265, Sec. 6, eff. June 18, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 677, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 4593), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.